Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-181
Sheridan.

The county of Sheridan is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southeast corner of township twenty-four, north, of range forty-one, west, of the sixth principal meridian; thence west to the southwest corner of township twenty-four, north, of range forty-six; thence north on the range line between ranges forty-six and forty-seven to the northern boundary line of the State of Nebraska; thence east along said boundary line to the range line between ranges forty and forty-one; thence south on said range line to the point of beginning.

Laws 1885, c. 34, § 1, p. 208;

R.S.1913, § 896;

C.S.1922, § 798;

C.S.1929, § 25-185;

R.S.1943, § 22-181.